New York, session 2025-2026, A3184.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 209-R to 2 read as follows: 3 § 209-R. Gift for rescued animals protection. Effective for any tax 4 year commencing on or after January first, two thousand twenty-five, a 5 taxpayer in any taxable year may elect to contribute to the rescued 6 animals spay and neuter fund. Such contribution shall be in any whole 7 dollar amount and shall not reduce the amount of state tax owed by such 8 taxpayer. The commissioner shall include space on the corporate income 9 tax return to enable a taxpayer to make such contribution. Notwith- 10 standing any other provision of law, all revenues collected pursuant to 11 this section shall be credited to the rescued animals spay and neuter 12 fund and shall be used only for those purposes enumerated in section 13 ninety-five-l of the state finance law. 14 § 2. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 630-m to read as 15 follows: 16 § 630-m. Gift for rescued animals protection. Effective for any tax 17 year commencing on or after January first, two thousand twenty-five, an 18 individual in any taxable year may elect to contribute to the rescued 19 animals spay and neuter fund. Such contribution shall be in any whole 20 dollar amount and shall not reduce the amount of state tax owed by such 21 individual. The commissioner shall include space on the personal income 22 tax return to enable an individual to make such contribution. Notwith- 23 standing any other provision of law, all revenues collected pursuant to 24 this section shall be credited to the rescued animals spay and neuter EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03761-01-5 A. 3184 2 1 fund and shall be used only for those purposes enumerated in section 2 ninety-five-l of the state finance law. 3 § 3. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 95-l to 4 read as follows: 5 § 95-l. Rescued animals spay and neuter fund. 1. There is hereby 6 established in the joint custody of the commissioner of agriculture and 7 markets and the comptroller a special fund to be known as the "rescued 8 animals spay and neuter fund". The commissioner of agriculture and 9 markets shall promulgate any rules and regulations the commissioner 10 deems necessary to implement and regulate such fund. 11 2. Such fund shall consist of: 12 a. all revenues received by the department of taxation and finance 13 pursuant to the provisions of sections two hundred nine-R and six 14 hundred thirty-m of the tax law; 15 b. all revenues received pursuant to appropriation by the legislature; 16 and 17 c. all other moneys appropriated, credited, or transferred thereto 18 from any other fund or source pursuant to law. 19 The commissioner of taxation and finance shall report annually to the 20 state comptroller the amounts designated for the fund pursuant to 21 sections two hundred nine-R and six hundred thirty-m of the tax law, who 22 shall transfer that amount to the fund. Nothing contained in this 23 section shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts, or 24 bequests for the purposes of the fund as defined in this section and 25 depositing them into the fund. 26 3. On or before the first day of February each year, the commissioner 27 of agriculture and markets shall provide a written report to the tempo- 28 rary president of the senate, speaker of the assembly, chair of the 29 senate finance committee, chair of the assembly ways and means commit- 30 tee, chair of the senate agriculture committee, chair of the assembly 31 agriculture committee, the state comptroller and the public. Such report 32 shall include how the monies of the fund were utilized during the 33 preceding calendar year, and shall include: 34 (a) the amount of money dispersed from the fund and the award process 35 used for such disbursements; 36 (b) recipients of awards from the fund; 37 (c) the amount awarded to each; 38 (d) the purposes for which such awards were granted; and 39 (e) a summary financial plan for such monies which shall include esti- 40 mates of all receipts and all disbursements for the current and succeed- 41 ing fiscal years, along with the actual results from the prior fiscal 42 year. 43 4. Moneys of the fund shall be expended for the purposes of carrying 44 out the provisions of section one hundred seventeen-a of the agriculture 45 and markets law. Moneys shall be paid out of the fund on the audit and 46 warrant of the state comptroller on vouchers approved by the commission- 47 er of agriculture and markets. Any interest received by the comptroller 48 on moneys on deposit in the animal population control fund shall be 49 retained in and become part of such fund. 50 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.